Hawaii, session 2026, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $307,252,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing capital improvement projects for the forty-third representative district, as follows: 1.   To be expended by the department of education: A.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Plans, design, construction, and equipment to replace stadium light fixtures. Plans                                      $ Design                                     $ Construction                                $ Equipment                                   $ Total funding                          $1,250,000 B.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Design and construction of a new performing arts auditorium to promote arts education. Design                                    $ 4,000,000 Construction                               $51,000,000 Total funding                         $55,000,000 C.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Design and construction of a new fourteen-classroom integrated academy building to address future student enrollment growth and expansion of innovative programs. Design                                    $ 3,000,000 Construction                               $37,000,000 Total funding                         $40,000,000 D.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Design and construction for the re-growing and sodding of the athletic stadium grass field to address safety issues. Design                                     $    1,000 Construction                                $1,000,000 Total funding                          $1,001,000 E.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Design and construction for the installation of field turf for the softball and baseball athletic fields. Design                                     $  500,000 Construction                                $7,500,000 Total funding                          $8,000,000 F.   Kapolei high school, Oahu Design and construction for the installation of a rubberized track to address safety issues. Design                                     $    1,000 Construction                                $2,000,000 Total funding                          $2,001,000 2.   To be expended by the department of transportation A.   Makakilo drive, Oahu Plans, design, construction, and equipment to extend Makakilo drive. Plans                                     $ Design                                    $ Construction                              $ Equipment                                 $ Total funding                        $200,000,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriations made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriations are made; provided that all moneys from the appropriations unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the respective departments for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________